Maine, session 132, LD344.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA c. 7-A, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶F-12, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 167, §14, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§33-G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §17103, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2023, c. 167, §15, is further
amended to read:
12. Defined contribution, deferred compensation and tax sheltered annuity plans.
The board shall establish one or more defined contribution, deferred compensation or tax
sheltered annuity plans consistent with the applicable requirements of the Internal Revenue
Code and may, with employer agreement, offer participation in such plans to employees
eligible for membership in a retirement program of the retirement system and to employees
of the Maine Retirement Savings Board.
Sec. 5. PL 2021, c. 356, §3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 167, §§16 and 17, is
repealed.
Sec. 6. PL 2021, c. 356, §4 is repealed.
Sec. 7. PL 2021, c. 356, §5 is repealed.